Utah statutes.
59-13-209.   Due date -- Delinquency -- Penalties -- Interest -- Collection
procedure.
(1) (a)  The motor fuel tax is due and payable by the distributor on or before
the last day of each month to the commission for the number of gallons of
motor fuel sold, used, or received for sale or use by the distributor during
the preceding calendar month.
(b)  The commission shall receipt the distributor for taxes paid and shall
promptly deposit all revenue with the state treasurer.
(2) (a)  If any distributor fails or refuses to pay any tax when it becomes
due and payable, the tax is delinquent.
(b)  If a distributor is delinquent in tax payments, the commission shall
impose a penalty as provided under Section 59-1-401.
(c)  The amount of the tax shall bear interest at the rate and in the manner
prescribed in Section 59-1-402.
(3) (a)  A report or payment of tax is not considered delinquent if the
envelope in which the report or remittance is enclosed bears a post office
cancellation mark dated on or before the date on which the report or payment
is due.
(b)  The commission, upon receipt of a report or remittance described in
Subsection (3)(a), shall treat the report or payment as if it had been
received on the date it was due.
(4)  If any part of a tax due is deficient or delinquent because of negligence
or disregard of this part, or in the case of false or fraudulent monthly
reports, or intent to evade the tax, a penalty shall be added to the tax due
as provided in Section 59-1-401.
(5) (a)  A tax due and unpaid under this part constitutes a debt due the state
and may be collected, together with interest, penalty, and costs, by
appropriate judicial proceeding.
(b)  The remedy described in Subsection (5)(a) is in addition to all other
remedies.
(6)  If the tax imposed by this part is not paid when it is due, collection
may be made in accordance with Chapter 1, Part 14, Assessment, Collections,
and Refunds Act.
